Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB938.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1383.1. Records to be kept.Each municipality shall keep records relating to the location of each child-care facility or other dependent care facility in accordance with the following:(1) Beginning December 2026, and each December thereafter, each county shall submit a list of each child- care facility or other dependent care facility to the municipality where the facility is located.(2) The county shall also submit the following for each child-care facility or other dependent care facility to the municipality where the facility is located:123456789101112131415161718 (i) The facility's address.(ii) The facility's telephone number.(iii) The floor plan of the facility.(iv) The facility's emergency plan.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0938PN1065 - 2 - 12345